Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1348
Act, how construed.

The Computer Crimes Act shall not be construed to preclude the applicability of any other provision of the Nebraska Criminal Code which may apply to any transaction described in the Computer Crimes Act.

Laws 1985, LB 371, § 7;

Laws 1991, LB 135, § 10.